District of Columbia statutes.
50-1641.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term “bicycle parking space” means a device or enclosure, located within a building or installation, or conveniently adjacent thereto, for securing a bicycle that is easily accessible, clearly visible and so located as to be reasonably secure from theft or vandalism.

History

Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-103, § 2, 54 DCR 12213

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority—Bicycle Commuter and Parking Expansion Amendment Act of 2007, see Mayor’s Order 2011-149, September 6, 2011 ( 58 DCR 8085).